Maryland, session 2025, HB1069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–706.
(Q) THE PROVISIONS OF § 12–211 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY TO
HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS.
Article – Insurance
12–211.
(a) In this section, “carrier” means:
(1) an insurer; [or]
(2) a nonprofit health service plan; OR
– 1 –

Ch. 396 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) A HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION.
(b) A HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY, A LIFE INSURANCE POLICY, AN ANNUITY
CONTRACT, A HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION CONTRACT, OR A disability
insurance policy may not be sold, delivered, or issued for delivery in the State by a carrier
if the policy contains a clause that purports to reserve sole discretion to the carrier to
interpret the terms of the policy or to provide standards of interpretation or review that are
inconsistent with the laws of the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –